Washington statutes.
RCW 40.20.010

"Business" defined.

For the purpose of this chapter, the term "business" shall mean and include business, industry, profession, occupation and calling of every kind.

[ 1949 c 223 s 3; Rem. Supp. 1949 s 1257-6.]